de: Produktformat der Sauce: Flocken; Flüssigkeit; Öl; Paste; Pulver; Sirup; Sonstige
pt-PT: Forma do produto molho: Flocos; Líquido; Óleo; Pasta; Em pó; Xarope; Outro
pt-BR: Molho, forma: Flocos; Líquido; Óleo; Pasta; Pó; Xarope; Outros
tr: Sos ürün formu: Pul; Sıvı; Yağ; Macun; Toz; Şurup; Diğer
lt-LT: Padažo produkto forma: Dribsniai; Skystis; Aliejus; Pasta; Milteliai; Sirupas; Kita
es: Forma de producto de salsa: Hojuelas; Líquido; Aceite; Pasta; Polvo; Jarabe; Otro
ko: 소스 제품 형태: 플레이크; 액상; 오일; 페이스트; 분말; 시럽; 기타
ru: Форма соуса: Хлопья; Жидкость; Масло; Паста; Порошок; Сироп; Другое
zh-TW: 醬料商品形式: 片狀; 液體; 油; 糊狀; 粉狀; 糖漿; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на продукта за сос: Люспи; Течност; Олио; Паста; Прах; Сироп; Друго
it: Forma del prodotto salsa: Scaglie; Liquido; Olio; Pasta; Polvere; Sciroppo; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika omake kot izdelka: Kosmiči; Tekočina; Olje; Pasta; Prah; Sirup; Drugo
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์ซอส: เกล็ด; ของเหลว; น้ำมัน; น้ำพริก/เพสต์; ผง; น้ำเชื่อม; อื่นๆ
vi: Dạng sản phẩm của nước xốt: Dạng mảnh; Dạng lỏng; Dạng dầu; Dạng hỗn hợp nhão; Dạng bột; Dạng xi-rô; Khác
ja: ソース商品フォーム: フレーク; 液体; オイル; ペースト; パウダー; シロップ; その他
sv: Produktform för sås: Flingor; Flytande; Olja; Pasta; Pulver; Sirap; Övrigt
da: Produktform for sauce: Flager; Flydende; Olie; Pasta; Pulver; Sirup; Andet
nl: Productvorm saus: Vlokken; Vloeistof; Olie; Pasta; Poeder; Siroop; Overige
ro-RO: Formă a produsului de tip sos: Fulgi; Lichid; Ulei; Pastă; Pudră; Sirop; Altele
el: Μορφή προϊόντος σάλτσας: Νιφάδες; Υγρό; Λάδι; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Σιρόπι; Άλλο
fi: Kastikkeen tuotemuoto: Hiutaleet; Neste; Öljy; Tahna; Jauhe; Siirappi; Muu
en: Sauce product form: Flakes; Liquid; Oil; Paste; Powder; Syrup; Other
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda umaka: Listići; Tekućina; Ulje; Pasta; Prah; Sirup; Ostalo
pl: Forma produktu w postaci sosu: Płatki; Płyn; Olej; Pasta; Proszek; Syrop; Inna
hu: Szósz termékformája: Pehely; Folyadék; Olaj; Paszta; Por; Szirup; Egyéb
cs: Forma produktu omáčky: Vločky; Tekutina; Olej; Pasta; Prášek; Sirup; Jiné
nb: Produktformat for saus: Flak; Flytende; Olje; Pasta; Pulver; Sirup; Annet
zh-CN: 酱料产品形态: 片状; 液体; 油状; 膏状; 粉末; 糖浆; 其他
sk-SK: Forma omáčky: Vločky; Tekutina; Olej; Pasta; Prášok; Sirup; Iné
fr: Forme du produit (sauce): Flocons; Liquide; Huile; Pâte; Poudre; Sirop; Autre